Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1266
Motion or other request under prior law; how treated.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before January 1, 2004, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 41.

The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act became operative on January 1, 2004, and establishes that all motions made in a child custody proceeding commenced prior to this date are governed by the prior law in effect at that time. The law governing child custody jurisdiction prior to the effective date of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act was the Nebraska Child Custody Jurisdiction Act. Floerchinger v. Floerchinger, 24 Neb. App. 120, 883 N.W.2d 419 (2016).